Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6235.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-6 of the General Laws entitled "Committees and Staff" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
22-6-16. Nonprofit funding transparency.
(a) Any nonprofit entity that receives grants or other funding in excess of fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) from the general assembly directly or appropriated through the state budget for
any fiscal year shall, within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the grant or appropriation, provide
information relating to employee compensation within the nonprofit entity to the general assembly.
(b) The nonprofit entity shall disclose the total benefit package paid to the five (5) highest
compensated employees with reportable compensation of at least one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) from the organization during the previous fiscal year. This disclosure shall include a
description of the position, the total salary or compensation paid along with all benefits provided
including, but not limited to, health insurance, retirement or pension contributions, and any other
allowances for items such as automobiles, lodging or communication devices. Provided, however,
the name of the individual employee need not be disclosed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002744/SUB A/2
========